Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 2
GENERAL ELECTIONS

1-4-201. Time of holding general election.

A general election shall be held in all precincts in this state on the Tuesday succeeding the first Monday of November in every even-numbered year.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 322, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 673, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-16-101 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

For the hours of voting, see § 1-7-101.

1-4-202. United States senators.

At the general election in 1984 and every six years thereafter, one United States senator shall be elected for the next term; and, at the general election in 1986 and every six years thereafter, one United States senator shall be elected for the next term.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 322, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 673, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-16-104 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-4-203. Representatives in congress.

At every general election, the number of representatives in congress to which the state is entitled shall be elected.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 322, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 673, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-16-105 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

For congressional districts, see § 2-1-101.

1-4-204. State and district officers.

At the general election in 1982 and every fourth year thereafter, the following state officers shall be elected: One governor, one lieutenant governor, one secretary of state, one state treasurer, and one attorney general. The lieutenant governor shall be elected jointly with the governor. At every general election, the number of members of the state house of representatives to which each representative district is entitled shall be elected in that district. Candidates for the offices of regents of the university of Colorado, state senators, members of the state board of education, and district attorneys shall be voted on at the general election immediately prior to the expiration of the regular terms for those offices.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 322, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 673, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-16-102 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

For terms of office for regents of the university of Colorado, see § 12 of art. IX, Colo. Const.; for terms of office for state senators, see § 2-2-103; for terms of office for members of the state board of education, see § 22-2-105; for terms of office for district attorneys, see § 13 of art. VI, Colo. Const.; for the election of presidential electors, see § 1-4-301; for the election of state officers, see §§ 1, 3, and 4 of art. IV, Colo. Const.; for the election of district judges, see §§ 10 and 11 of art. VI, Colo. Const.; for the election of district attorneys, see § 13 of art. VI, Colo. Const.; for the division of county into districts for the purpose of electing county commissioners, see § 30-10-306.

1-4-205. County commissioners.

Members of the board of county commissioners shall be elected in each county, excluding a city and county, for a term of four years.

No person shall be a county commissioner unless that person is a registered elector and has resided in the district for at least one year prior to the election.

Each county having a population of less than seventy thousand shall have three county commissioners, any two of whom shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. One commissioner shall be elected at the general election in 1982 and every four years thereafter, and two commissioners shall be elected at the general election in 1984 and every four years thereafter.

In each county having a population of seventy thousand or more, the board of county commissioners may consist either of three members, any two of whom shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, or of five members, any three of whom shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

If the board consists of three commissioners, they shall be elected as provided in subsection (2) of this section and as provided in section 30-10-306.7 (5), C.R.S.

In any county having a population of seventy thousand or more, the membership of the board of county commissioners may be increased from three to five members pursuant to section 30-10-306.5, C.R.S., or decreased from five to three members pursuant to section 30-10-306.7 (2)(a)(II), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 323, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 88:

(3)(b) and (3)(c) amended, p. 1113, § 3, effective April 9; (1) amended, p. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 1989.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 674, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-16-106 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

For election and terms of county officers, see §§ 6 and 8 of art. XIV, Colo. Const.; for statutes relating to county officers generally, see article 10 of title 30.

1-4-206. Other county officers.

At the general election in 1982 and every four years thereafter, one county clerk and recorder, who shall be ex officio recorder of deeds and clerk of the board of county commissioners; one sheriff qualified pursuant to section 30-10-501.5, C.R.S.; one coroner qualified pursuant to section 30-10-601.5, C.R.S.; one treasurer, who shall be collector of taxes; one county superintendent of schools, unless the office of county superintendent of schools is abolished at a general election; one county surveyor; and one county assessor shall be elected in each county, excluding a city and county. The term of office of all such officials shall be four years.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 323, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 304, § 5, effective June 8.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 674, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1830, § 1, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-16-107 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

For county officers' elections, terms, and salaries, see § 8 of art. XIV, Colo. Const.